Massachusetts, session 194th, S1694.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
striking the following in subsection (a):- "; or (v) a shroud that encircles either all or part of the
barrel designed to shield the bearer’s hand from heat, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel"
SECTION 2. Section 16 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
striking the following in subsection (b):- "; or (iv) a shroud that encircles either all or part of the
barrel designed to shield the bearer’s hand from heat, excluding a slide that encloses the barrel"
of 1